Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
MEAT PROCESSORS AND RELATED INDUSTRIES

§159-36 Articles not intended for human
food. Inspection is not provided under this chapter at any establishment
for the slaughter of cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules, or other
equines, or the preparation of any carcasses or parts or products of animals,
which are not intended for use as human food. All meat or meat products, prior
to their offer for sale or transportation in intrastate commerce, unless
naturally inedible by humans, shall be denatured or otherwise identified as
prescribed by the board to deter their use for human food. No person shall
buy, sell, transport, or offer for sale or transportation, or receive for
transportation, in intrastate commerce, any carcasses, parts thereof, or meat
or meat products of any animals, which are not intended for use as human food
unless they are denatured or otherwise identified as required by the rules
adopted by the board or are naturally inedible by humans. [L 1969, c 214, pt of
§1; am L 1990, c 139, §8; am L 1991, c 88, §1; am L 1993, c 248, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next